Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.080

Issuance of licenses.

Except as provided in RCW 43.24.112, at the close of each examination the department of licensing shall prepare the proper licenses, where no further fee is required to be paid, and issue licenses to the successful applicants signed by the director and notify all successful applicants, where a further fee is required, of the fact that they are entitled to receive such license upon the payment of such further fee to the department of licensing and notify all applicants who have failed to pass the examination of that fact.

[ 1997 c 58 s 866; 1979 c 158 s 99; 1965 c 100 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.24.080. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 101; RRS s 10859.]

NOTES:

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.